District of Columbia statutes.
37-201.24

Police power conferred upon Director; inspections without warrants.

There is hereby conferred upon the Director, his assistants and inspectors, police power, and in the exercise of their duties they shall, upon demand, exhibit their badges to any person questioning their authority; and they are authorized and empowered to make arrests of any person violating any of the provisions of this subchapter. The Director, his assistants, and inspectors may, for the purpose of carrying out and enforcing the provisions of this subchapter and in the performance of their official duties, with or without formal warrant, enter or go into or upon any stand, place, building, or premises, except a private residence, and may stop any vendor, peddler, dealer, vehicle, or person in charge thereof for the purpose of making inspections or tests.

Mar. 3, 1921, 41 Stat. 1224, ch. 118, § 24
Apr. 11, 1946, 60 Stat. 88, ch. 134, § 1
Warrants and arrests, see § 23-501 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 10-128.
1973 Ed., § 10-126.
Department of Weights, Measures and Markets abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 37-201.01.